Rhode Island, session 2025, SB887.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-87-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-87 entitled "Civil Rights
of People with Disabilities" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-87-2. Discrimination prohibited.
(a) No otherwise qualified person with a disability shall, solely by reason of the person’s
disability, be subject to discrimination by any person or entity doing business in the state; nor shall
any otherwise qualified person with a disability be excluded from participation in or denied the
benefits of any program, activity, or service of, or, by any person or entity regulated, by the state
or having received financial assistance from the state or under any program or activity conducted
by the state, its agents, or any entity doing business with the state.
(b) Provided, if any provision or provisions of Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of
1973, prohibiting discrimination based on disability in federally funded programs or activities,
codified at 29 U.S.C. § 794, and any implementing regulations relating to prohibiting this
discrimination, are determined by the Rhode Island commission for human rights and the
governor’s commission on disabilities, to have been repealed or to have been declared invalid or
nullified by the final judgment of a federal court applicable to the state or by executive or
administrative action, which shall be deemed to include an action of the federal executive or judicial
branch that nullifies the effectiveness of 29 U.S.C. § 794 in prohibiting discrimination based on
disability in federally funded programs or activities, then the following shall apply:

(1) Discrimination prohibited under this chapter shall continue to include those acts
prohibited on the basis of disability by 29 U.S.C. § 794, and any implementing regulations, as those
regulations were in effect as of the date immediately prior to date of the repeal, revocation, or
nullification.
(2) The provisions of this section shall be interpreted broadly and to the fullest extent
possible under state and federal law, in order to continue the protections afforded persons with
disabilities under this chapter and throughout the general laws of the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002628
========
LC002628 - Page 2 of 3